District of Columbia statutes.
32-1604

Council approval of state workforce plans.

Upon the Mayor’s approval of the state plan described in § 32-1603(f)(2)(A), or any modification of such plan, the Mayor shall transmit the state plan to the Council for a 10-day period of review. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the state plan or modification, by resolution, within the 10-day review period, the state workforce plan shall be deemed approved.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 5, 47 DCR 4644
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 129(b), 56 DCR 1117
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(d), 62 DCR 1518

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 substituted “Council of the District of Columbia” for “Council”; and validated a previously made technical correction by substituting “Council” for “Board”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-263 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Establishment and Appointments—D.C. State Rehabilitation Council, see Mayor’s Order 2001-173, November 30, 2001 ( 48 DCR 11586).